Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.210

Metropolitan water pollution abatement advisory committee.

If a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to perform the function of metropolitan water pollution abatement, the metropolitan council shall, prior to the effective date of the assumption of such function, cause a metropolitan water pollution abatement advisory committee to be formed by notifying the legislative body of each component city and county which operates a sewer system to appoint one person to serve on such advisory committee and the board of commissioners of each water-sewer district which operates a sewer system, any portion of which lies within the metropolitan area, to appoint one person to serve on such committee. The metropolitan water pollution abatement advisory committee shall meet at the time and place provided in the notice and elect a chair. The members of such committee shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing bodies and shall receive no compensation other than reimbursement for expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties. The function of such advisory committee shall be to advise the metropolitan council in matters relating to the performance of the water pollution abatement function.

[ 2011 c 124 s 1; 2009 c 549 s 2103; 1999 c 153 s 33; 1974 ex.s. c 70 s 7; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.210. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 21.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.